Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-209
Criminal identification; fingerprints and descriptions; duties of law enforcement officers and agencies.

It is hereby made the duty of the sheriffs of the several counties of the State of Nebraska, the chiefs of police of incorporated cities therein, marshals of incorporated cities and towns therein, and agencies of state government having powers of arrest to furnish the Nebraska State Patrol two copies of fingerprints on forms provided by the Nebraska State Patrol and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and descriptions of all persons who are arrested by them (1) for any felony or (2) as felony fugitives from the criminal justice system of another jurisdiction. This section is not intended to include violators of city ordinances or of persons arrested for other trifling offenses. The Nebraska State Patrol shall in all appropriate cases forward one copy of such fingerprints and other necessary identifying data and information to the system maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Laws 1921, c. 207, § 2, p. 739;

C.S.1922, § 9943;

C.S.1929, § 29-209;

R.S.1943, § 29-209;

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 16.

Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History Information Act, see section 29-3501.